Tennessee statutes. Title 6 Cities And Towns
Part 3

Police Authority and Penalties for Violations

6-54-301. Extension of police authority beyond limits.

The police authority of all incorporated towns and cities shall extend to a distance of one (1) mile from the lawful corporate limits thereof, for the suppression of all disorderly acts and practices forbidden by the general laws of the state; provided, that such jurisdiction of an incorporated town or city shall not be hereby extended beyond the limits of the county in which any part of such town is situated, or so as to come within one (1) mile of any other incorporated town or city.

Acts 1870, ch. 67, § 1; Shan., § 1924; Code 1932, § 3336; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-609.

Cross-References. Arrests by private persons, § 40-7-109.

Assistance by law enforcement personnel from other jurisdictions, agreements to provide, § 6-54-307.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 18.164.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 3 Tenn. Juris., Arrest, § 3; 19 Tenn. Juris., Municipal Corporations, § 28.

6-54-302. Service of warrants outside city.

Any duly and regularly appointed police officer of a municipality having a duly constituted city or municipal court has the authority to serve warrants for the arrest of persons for municipal offenses committed within the municipal limits, at any point within the county wherein the municipality is located.

Acts 1941, ch. 11, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 3343.1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-610.

Attorney General Opinions. Municipal police officers' authority to execute state arrest warrants, OAG 98-0153, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 153 (8/17/98).

Extent of municipal police authority beyond municipal limits. OAG 10-48, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 48 (4/12/10).

6-54-303. Execution on municipal court judgments.

In all municipal courts where the judge has entered a judgment for fines and costs, and same remain unpaid for thirty (30) days thereafter, the court is authorized by and through its clerk to issue execution thereon from the court in the same manner and methods as prescribed in title 26, chapters 1-3, and the clerks shall assess the same fees and costs as allowable to clerks of general sessions court.

For purpose of service of a levy of execution or execution by garnishment, the police officers of the municipality are empowered to serve the same anywhere in the county.

Code 1858, § 1379 (deriv. Acts 1849-1850, ch. 17, § 3); Shan., § 1968; mod. Code 1932, § 3375; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-616; Acts 1983, ch. 327, § 1.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

Attorney General Opinions. Municipal courts' authority to issue executions on judgments for fines and costs, OAG 98-0153, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 153 (8/17/98).

6-54-304. Disposition of fines and costs.

The procedure set out in § 6-54-303 shall likewise apply to judgments for fines and costs of municipal courts exercising concurrent jurisdiction with general sessions courts.

Upon collection of state fines and costs, the clerk shall remit those portions due the county and state as though paid by the defendant before levy or execution.

Notwithstanding subdivision (b)(1), in any county having a population of not less than seventy-four thousand five hundred (74,500) nor more than seventy-four thousand six hundred (74,600), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census, and in any county having a population of not less than forty-nine thousand four hundred (49,400) and not more than forty-nine thousand five hundred (49,500), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the clerk of a municipal court shall, upon collection of state fines and costs, remit such fines and costs to the municipality for which the municipal court was created as though paid by the defendant before levy or execution.

Acts 1891, ch. 110, § 1; Shan., § 1969; mod. Code 1932, § 3376; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-617; Acts 1983, ch. 327, § 2; 1986, ch. 608, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Appeals to circuit court, title 27, ch. 5.

Office of municipal judge, title 16, ch. 18.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

Attorney General Opinions. Municipal police officers' service of execution on municipal court judgments, OAG 98-0153, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 153 (8/17/98).

Constitutionality of exemption of certain counties from provisions for fine distribution, OAG 99-114, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 114 (5/14/99).

6-54-305. Collection of fines for nonmoving traffic violations — Service by mail.

Any municipality or metropolitan government having a city or metropolitan court is empowered to permit by ordinance service of process through the use of registered mail or certified mail, addressee only, return receipt requested, in lieu of personal service of process in an action of debt involving nonpayment of any ticket or citation issued for any nonmoving traffic violation. This section shall only apply to municipalities having a population of thirty-two thousand (32,000) or more, according to the 1970 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Acts 1973, ch. 61, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-618; Acts 1987, ch. 174, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For table of populations of Tennessee municipalities see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Certified mail in lieu of registered mail, § 1-3-111.

Office of municipal judge, title 16, ch. 18.

Attorney General Opinions. Collection of judgments due municipalities, OAG 97-029, 1997 Tenn. AG LEXIS 28 (3/31/97).

6-54-306. Penalty for violation of home rule municipal ordinances.

All home rule municipalities are empowered to set maximum penalties of thirty (30) days imprisonment or monetary penalties and forfeitures, or both imprisonment and monetary penalties and forfeitures, up to five hundred dollars ($500), or both, to cover administrative expenses incident to correction of municipal violations.

Notwithstanding the limitations on recovery of administrative costs imposed in subsection (a), if a home rule municipality has adopted an ordinance to prohibit false threats or hoaxes involving biological weapons, destructive devices, or weapons of mass destruction, then the municipality may recover actual administrative expenses incurred as a result of any such prohibited threat or hoax.

Acts 1974, ch. 592, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-619; Acts 1991, ch. 350, § 1; 2002, ch. 746, § 1.

Law Reviews.

The Fifty-Dollar Fines Clause Re-emerges After Thirty-Five Years of Slumber (Doug Hamill), 70 Tenn. L. Rev. 887 (2003).

Attorney General Opinions. Criminal liability of parents for acts of children, OAG 98-019, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 19 (1/15/98).

Municipal judge's imposition of penalty greater than $50 for ordinance violation, OAG 99-120, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 120 (5/17/99).

6-54-307. Mutual aid agreements.

Incorporated cities and towns are authorized to enter into contracts and mutual aid agreements with other incorporated cities and towns, counties, and metropolitan airport authorities that provide law enforcement service within the state and with those of any other states or with any agency of the United States to the extent that the laws of such other state or the United States permit such joint contracts or agreements to furnish one another assistance in law enforcement.

Incorporated cities and towns may also enter into contracts with an organization of residents and property owners of an unincorporated community for the purpose of providing law enforcement assistance to such unincorporated community.

Contracts or mutual aid agreements entered into pursuant to this section by an incorporated city or town shall, in the judgment of the city's or town's governing body, be advantageous to and serve the public interest of the city or town.

In authorizing or permitting its law enforcement officers to answer calls outside the corporate limits as authorized in this section, and in answering such calls, the city or town and its officers and employees shall be considered as acting in a governmental capacity.

Any officer, or employee of a police department of an incorporated city or town, while engaged in any duty or activity in connection with this section or pursuant to orders or instructions from such person's officers or superiors, shall be entitled to all rights, privileges, exemptions and immunities as if such duty or activity were performed within the corporate limits of the incorporated city or town by which such person is employed.

Acts 1987, ch. 233, § 1; 1990, ch. 921, § 1.

Cross-References. Extension of police authority beyond corporate limits, § 6-54-301.

Interlocal agreements, § 12-9-104.

Interlocal Cooperation Act, title 12, ch. 9.

Attorney General Opinions. Applicability to political subdivisions of other states, OAG 88-39, 1988 Tenn. AG LEXIS 39 (2/24/88).

Extent of municipal police authority beyond municipal limits. OAG 10-48, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 48 (4/12/10).

6-54-308. Penalty for violation of nonhome rule municipal ordinances.

Except as provided in § 6-54-306 for home rule municipalities, the legislative body of any other municipality may establish a monetary penalty not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) for each violation of an ordinance of such municipality.

The authority for increased monetary penalties for ordinance violations provided by this section does not apply to ordinances regulating all moving traffic violations.

Acts 1993, ch. 393, § 1.